Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.121, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Open meeting law; observation of ballot board activities by candidate or political party. new text end new text begin Meetings of a ballot board are subject to chapter 13D. The ballot board must conduct its work, including the counting of ballots, in a manner that allows any candidate appearing on the ballot, that candidate's representative, or the representative of any political party appearing on the ballot to observe the ballot board's work. A candidate may have one representative present to observe the acceptance and rejection of absentee ballot envelopes, and one additional representative present at the time accepted absentee ballot secrecy envelopes are opened, and when those ballots are deposited in a ballot box and counted. If other election materials are handled or examined by the ballot board, the candidates and their representatives may observe them. The ballot board must ensure that members of the public, candidates, candidate representatives, and representatives of a political party do not interfere with the counting of the ballots. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [204C.362] PUBLIC OBSERVATION OF RECOUNT. new text end new text begin During a recount, containers of voted ballots must be unsealed and resealed within public view. No ballots or election materials may be handled by candidates, their representatives, or members of the public. There must be an area of the room from which the public may observe the recount. Cell phones and video cameras may be used in this public viewing area, as long as their use is not disruptive. The recount official shall arrange the counting of the ballots so that the candidates and their representatives may observe the ballots as they are recounted. Candidates may each have one representative observe the sorting of each precinct. One additional representative per candidate may observe the ballots when they have been sorted and are being counted. Candidates may have additional representatives in the public viewing area of the room. If other election materials are handled or examined by the recount officials, the candidates and their representatives may observe them. The recount official shall ensure that public observation does not interfere with the counting of the ballots. new text end